Missouri, session 2026, SB1535.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 137, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 137.1053, to read as
follows:
137.1053. 1. The section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Disabled Veteran Homestead Tax Credit
Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "County", any county or city not within a county
in this state;
(2) "Disability rating", the percentage of disability
assigned to a disabled veteran by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, reflecting the degree to
which the veteran's disability impacts his or her ability to
work and perform daily activities;
(3) "Disabled veteran", a Missouri resident who has
been separated under honorable conditions from active
service in any branch or reserve component of the Armed
Forces of the United States or the National Guard of a state
as defined in 32 U.S.C. Section 101, as amended, and has a
service-connected disability and has received a disability

SB 1535 2
rating of one hundred percent permanent and total as
certified by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs;
(4) "Eligible owner", an individual who is a disabled
veteran, is the owner of record of the qualified residence
or has a legal or equitable interest in a qualified
residence as evidenced by a written instrument, and is
liable for the payment of real property taxes on the
qualified residence;
(5) "Homestead", the residential real property that is
used as a primary residence and the adjacent real property
as is reasonably necessary for use of the residence as a
home dwelling;
(6) "Primary residence", the real property owned and
occupied by an eligible owner as the principal place of
residence, and not to exceed five acres of land surrounding
it as is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a
home;
(7) "Qualified amount", for any eligible owner in a
given tax year, the total amount of real property taxes
levied and imposed on the qualified residence and shall
include all ad valorem taxes levied on the qualified
residence by any county or other political subdivision
including, but not limited to, county levies, municipal
levies, school district levies including bonded indebtedness
levies, fire protection district levies, library district
levies, and any other local ad valorem levy authorized by
law, but shall exclude the levy imposed for the state blind
pension fund;
(8) "Qualified residence", the homestead of an
eligible owner that has a market value not to exceed five
hundred thousand dollars, but less any portion of that

SB 1535 3
property that is used for commercial purposes. If the
property, or a portion of the property, is rented out to
another person for more than six months, it is presumed to
be used for commercial purposes. No more than one property
per qualified owner per tax year shall be claimed as a
qualified residence under this section;
(9) "Real property tax credit", a credit against an
eligible owner's liability for tax on the qualified
residence that is levied and imposed by the governing body
of a county or other political subdivision of this state
with the power to levy and impose taxes on real property in
this state.
3. (1) As allowed by the authority granted under
Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, for
all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a
county may grant an annual real property tax credit, as
calculated in this subsection, for the qualified residence
of an eligible owner if such county adopts an order,
ordinance, or resolution authorizing such real property tax
credit in such county.
(2) The amount of a real property tax credit provided
under this section shall be equal to the qualified amount of
real property taxes levied and imposed on the eligible
owner's qualified residence for such tax year, excluding the
levy for the state blind pension fund.
(3) If the total market value of the dwelling and
surrounding acreage does not exceed five hundred thousand
dollars, ownership of additional acreage shall not
disqualify an owner from eligibility under the provisions of
this section.
4. The real property tax credit under this section
carries over to the benefit of the eligible owner's

SB 1535 4
surviving spouse as long as the spouse holds the legal or
beneficial title to the qualified residence, permanently
resides therein, and does not remarry. No real property tax
credit shall be allowed for the tax year in which the
surviving spouse remarries, no longer holds legal or
beneficial title, or relocates to a different primary
residence.
5. Real property tax credits issued under the
provisions of this section shall not be refundable. No real
property tax credit claimed under this section shall be
carried forward to any subsequent tax year. The real
property tax credit allowed under this section shall not be
transferred, assigned, sold, or otherwise conveyed, except
as provided under this section.
6. Real property tax credits authorized under the
provisions of this section shall not reduce assessed
valuation and shall not be construed as an exemption from
real property taxes. The security for any bonded
100 indebtedness based on assessed valuation shall remain intact.
101 7. An eligible owner who receives a real property tax
102 credit granted under this section shall not be eligible for
103 any other real property tax relief, the property tax credits
104 under sections 135.010 to 135.035, or any other tax credits
105 relating to the eligible owner's qualified residence under
106 this chapter or chapter 135.
107 8. Participation in the program under this section is
108 optional as follows:
109 (1) Any county may, by a majority affirmative vote of
110 the governing body of such county, opt in to the provisions
111 of this section for the next year of the general
112 reassessment, prior to January first of any year;

SB 1535 5
113 (2) If the county opts in to the provisions of this
114 section, participation in this program for an eligible owner
115 is also optional. An eligible owner electing to participate
116 in the provisions under this section may opt in by notifying
117 the local collector's office or other entity of such
118 election to request a real property tax credit; and
119 (3) The governing body of the county may, by a
120 majority affirmative vote, opt to rescind and cease the real
121 property tax credit program authorized under this section
122 and previously adopted by the governing body, for the next
123 year of the general reassessment, prior to January first of
124 any year. Any rescission shall be prospective only and
125 shall affect real property tax credits previously applied.
126 9. The governing body of the county may adopt
127 reasonable procedures and promulgate ordinances, rules, and
128 regulations in order to implement and administer the
129 provisions of this section.
130 10. The assessor's office, collector's office, or
131 other entity designated by rule, regulation, or ordinance
132 shall administer the real property tax credit allowed under
133 this section in the same manner as the tax credit authorized
134 under section 137.1050 and shall be subject to similar
135 application, verification, and renewal procedures as adopted
136 by such county, if applicable. Eligibility determinations
137 shall be made in accordance with guidelines established by
138 this section and any additional local rules or regulations.
139 11. For the purposes of calculating property tax
140 levies under section 137.073, and for all other laws
141 prescribing the distribution or allocation of property tax
142 revenues, the total amount of real property tax credits
143 authorized under this section shall be considered tax

SB 1535 6
144 revenue actually received by the county or other political
145 subdivision.
146 12. A real property tax credit granted under this
147 section shall not affect the process of setting the tax rate
148 as required under Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution
149 of Missouri and section 137.073 in any prior, current, or
150 subsequent tax year.
151 13. Nothing in this section shall impair the
152 obligation of any contract, reduce or restrict the taxing
153 authority of any political subdivision, or alter the
154 calculation of assessed valuation for the purposes of bonded
155 indebtedness.
✓